Hawaii statutes.
§604-20 Powers of clerk. The clerks of
the district court shall have, within the scope of the jurisdiction of the
district courts, all the powers of clerks of other courts of record, including
the power to sign and enter judgments, subject to the direction of the court;
administer oaths; sign and issue garnishee summons, writs of attachment,
execution and possession, and other process; and take depositions. [L 1971, c
144, §8A]

Rules of Court

See DCRCP rules 77, 79.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next